California statutes. Commercial Code
(g) If a person acknowledges that it has or will obtain control on
 behalf of another person, unless the person otherwise agrees or law other than this division or Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) otherwise provides, the person does not owe any duty to the other person and is not required to confirm the acknowledgment to any other person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 27.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12106.

(a) An account debtor on a controllable account or controllable payment intangible may discharge its obligation by paying either of the following:

(1) The person having control of the controllable electronic record that evidences the controllable account or controllable payment intangible.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a person that formerly had control of the controllable electronic record.

(b) Subject to subdivision (d), the account debtor shall not discharge its obligation by paying a person that formerly had control of the
 controllable electronic record if the account debtor receives a notification that meets all of the following:

(1) Is signed by a person that formerly had control or the person to which control was transferred.

(2) Reasonably identifies the controllable account or controllable payment intangible.

(3) Notifies the account debtor that control of the controllable electronic record that evidences the controllable account or controllable payment intangible was transferred.

(4) Identifies the transferee, in any reasonable way, including by name, identifying number, cryptographic key, office, or account number.

(5) Provides a commercially reasonable method by which the account debtor is to pay the transferee.

(c) After receipt of a notification that complies with subdivision (b), the account debtor may discharge its obligation by paying in accordance with the notification and shall not discharge the obligation by paying a person that formerly had control.

(d) Subject to subdivision (h), notification is ineffective under subdivision (b) if any of the following apply:

(1) Unless, before the notification is sent, the account debtor and the person that, at that time, had control of the controllable electronic record that evidences the controllable account or controllable payment intangible agree in a signed record to a commercially
 reasonable method by which a person may furnish reasonable proof that control has been transferred.

(2) To the extent an agreement between the account debtor and seller of a payment intangible limits the account debtor’s duty to pay a person other than the seller and the limitation is effective under law other than this division.

(3) At the option of the account debtor, if the notification notifies the account debtor to do any of the following:

(A) Divide the payment.

(B) Make less than the full amount of an installment or other periodic payment.

(C) Pay any part of a payment by more than one method or to more
 than one person.

(e) Subject to subdivision (h), if requested by the account debtor, the person giving the notification under subdivision (b) seasonably shall furnish reasonable proof, using the method in the agreement referred to in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), that control of the controllable electronic record has been transferred. Unless the person complies with the request, the account debtor may discharge its obligation by paying a person that formerly had control, even if the account debtor has received a notification under subdivision (b).

(f) A person furnishes reasonable proof under subdivision (e) that control has been transferred if the person demonstrates, using the method in the agreement referred to in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), that the transferee has
 the power to do all of the following:

(1) Avail itself of substantially all the benefit from the controllable electronic record.

(2) Prevent others from availing themselves of substantially all the benefit from the controllable electronic record.

(3) Transfer the powers specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) to another person.

(g) Subject to subdivision (h), an account debtor may not waive or vary its rights under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) or under subdivision (e), or its option under paragraph (3) of subdivision (d).

(h) This section is subject to law other than this division which establishes
 a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 90.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12107.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the local law of a controllable electronic record’s jurisdiction governs a matter covered by this division.

(b) For a controllable electronic record that evidences a controllable account or controllable payment intangible, the local law of the controllable electronic record’s jurisdiction governs a matter covered by Section 12106 unless an effective agreement determines that the local law of another jurisdiction governs.

(c) The following rules determine a controllable electronic record’s jurisdiction under this section:

(1) If the controllable electronic record, or a record attached to or logically associated with the controllable electronic record and readily available for review, expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the controllable electronic record’s jurisdiction for purposes of this division or this code, that jurisdiction is the controllable electronic record’s jurisdiction.

(2) If paragraph (1) does not apply and the rules of the system in which the controllable electronic record is recorded are readily available for review and expressly provide that a particular jurisdiction is the controllable electronic record’s jurisdiction for purposes of this division or this code, that jurisdiction is the controllable electronic record’s jurisdiction.

(3) If paragraphs (1) and
 (2) do not apply and the controllable electronic record, or a record attached to or logically associated with the controllable electronic record and readily available for review, expressly provides that the controllable electronic record is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the controllable electronic record’s jurisdiction.

(4) If paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, do not apply and the rules of the system in which the controllable electronic record is recorded are readily available for review and expressly provide that the controllable electronic record or the system is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the controllable electronic record’s jurisdiction.

(5) If paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, do not apply,
 the controllable electronic record’s jurisdiction is the District of Columbia.

(d) If paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) and Article 12 is not in effect in the District of Columbia without material modification, the governing law for a matter covered by this division is the law of the District of Columbia as though Article 12 were in effect in the District of Columbia without material modification. In this subdivision, “Article 12” means Article 12 of Uniform Commercial Code Amendments (2022).

(e) To the extent subdivisions (a) and (b) provide that the local law of the controllable electronic record’s jurisdiction governs a matter covered by this division, that law governs even if the matter or a transaction to which the matter relates does not bear any relation to the
 controllable electronic record’s jurisdiction.

(f) The rights acquired under Section 12104 by a purchaser or qualifying purchaser are governed by the law applicable under this section at the time of purchase.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 90.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 13. EFFECTIVE DATE AND REPEALER [13101. - 13105.]

13101.

This code shall become effective on January 1, 1965. It applies to transactions entered into and events occurring after that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 8.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

13102.

Transactions validly entered into before January 1, 1965, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from them remain valid thereafter and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced as required or permitted by any statute or other law amended or repealed by this act as though such repeal or amendment had not occurred; provided, however, that the perfection of a security interest (other than a security interest (i) in a motor vehicle or vessel required to be registered under the Vehicle Code unless such vehicle or vessel is
 inventory or (ii) in personal property, including fixtures, which constitutes a portion of the properties included in an agreement which is a mortgage or deed of trust of both real and personal property made to secure the payment of bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized or permitted to be issued by the Commissioner of Corporations, or made by a public utility as defined in the Public Utilities Code), as defined in this code (Section 1201), and however denominated in any law repealed by this act, (a) Which was perfected on or before January 1, 1965, by a filing or recording under a law repealed by this act and requiring a further filing or recording to continue its perfection, continues until and will lapse on the date provided by the law so repealed for such further filing or recording.(b) Which was perfected on or before January 1, 1965, by a filing or recording under a law repealed by this act and requiring no further filing or recording to continue its perfection, continues until and will lapse 12 months after January 1, 1965.(c) Which was perfected on or before January 1, 1965, without any filing or recording, but with respect to which a financing statement is required to be filed in order for it to be perfected under this code, continues until and will lapse 12 months after January 1, 1965;unless, in each case, a continuation statement is filed by the secured party within 12 months before the perfection of the security interest would otherwise lapse. Any such continuation statement must be signed by the secured party, identify the original security agreement, however denominated, state the office where
 and the date when last filed or refiled, or recorded or rerecorded, and the filing number or recordation data and further state that the original security agreement is still effective. Subdivision (1) of Section 9501 determines the proper place to file such a continuation statement. Except as herein specified the provisions of Sections 9515 and 9522 apply to such a continuation statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

13103.

Except as provided in the following section, all acts and parts of acts inconsistent with this act are hereby repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 8.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

13105.

(1) A financing statement or a continuation thereof, properly filed and effective pursuant to Section 9401 as it existed prior to January 1, 1971, remains valid and effective after January 1, 1971, until expiration of the usual five-year period from date of filing. Any termination, release, assignment, or amendment of the financing statement prior to expiration of the five-year period of effectiveness shall be filed, as previously required, with the county recorder who has filed the financing statement.

(2) After January 1, 1971, any continuation of a financing statement which had been properly filed with a county recorder prior to January 1, 1971, and which now would be required to be filed with the Secretary of State, shall be filed with the Secretary of State in accordance with Sections 9515 and 9516. The continuation statement shall be accompanied by a certified copy of the entire record of the county recorder related to the financing statement. After filing of the continuation statement with the Secretary of State, any termination, release, assignment, amendment, or continuation of the financing statement shall also be filed with the Secretary of State and any documents affecting the financing statement that are not filed with the Secretary of State shall not be effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14. EFFECTIVE DATE AND TRANSITION PROVISIONS [14101. - 14109.]

14101.

The amendments to this code, as adopted by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session, shall become effective at 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 1976.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

14102.

The provisions of Division 13 shall continue to apply to this code, as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session, and for this purpose this code as it existed prior to January 1, 1976, and this code, as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session, shall be considered one continuous statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

14103.

Transactions validly entered into after January 1, 1965, and before January 1, 1976, and which were subject to the provisions of this code and which would be subject to this code as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session if they had been entered into after January 1, 1976, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from the transactions remain valid after January 1, 1976, and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced as required or permitted by this code as amended by the Legislature at the 1972 Regular Session. Security interests arising out of these transactions which are perfected on January 1, 1976, shall remain perfected until they lapse as provided in this code as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session, and may be continued as permitted by this code as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session, except as stated in Section 14105.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.

A security interest for the perfection of which filing or the taking of possession was required under this code and which attached prior to January 1, 1976, but was not perfected shall be deemed perfected on January 1, 1975, if this code as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session permits perfection without filing or authorizes filing in the office or offices where a prior ineffective filing was made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.

(1) A financing statement or continuation statement filed prior to January 1, 1976, which shall not have lapsed prior to January 1, 1976, shall remain effective for the period provided in this code as it existed prior to January 1, 1976, but not less than five years after the filing.

(2) With respect to any collateral acquired by the debtor subsequent to January 1, 1976, any effective financing statement or continuation statement described in this section shall apply only if the filing or filings are in the office or offices that would be appropriate to perfect the security interests in the new collateral under this code as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session.

(3) The effectiveness of any financing statement or continuation statement filed prior to January 1, 1976, may be continued by a continuation statement as permitted by this code as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular
 Session, except that if this code, as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session, requires a filing in an office where there was no previous financing statement, a new financing statement conforming to Section 14106 shall be filed in that office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

14106.

(1) If a security interest is perfected or has priority on January 1, 1976, as to all persons or as to certain persons without any filing or recording, and if the filing of a financing statement would be required for the perfection or priority of the security interest against those persons under this code, as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session, the perfection and priority rights of the security interest continue until January 1, 1979. The perfection will then lapse unless a financing statement is filed as provided in subdivision (4) or unless the security interest is perfected otherwise than by filing.

(2) If a security interest is perfected on January 1, 1976, under a law other than this code which requires no further filing, refiling or recording to continue its perfection, perfection continues until and will lapse January 1, 1979, unless a financing statement is filed as provided in subdivision (4) or unless the
 security interest is perfected otherwise than by filing, or unless under Section 9311 the other law continues to govern filing.

(3) If a security interest is perfected by a filing, refiling or recording under a law repealed by this code as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session which required further filing, refiling or recording to continue its perfection, perfection continues and will lapse on the date provided by the law so repealed for a further filing, refiling, or recording unless a financing statement is filed as provided in subdivision (4) or unless the security interest is perfected otherwise than by filing.

(4) A financing statement may be filed within six months before the perfection of a security interest would otherwise lapse. Any such financing statement may be signed by either the debtor or the secured party. It must identify the security agreement, statement, or notice (however denominated in any statute or other law
 repealed or modified by this code as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session), state the office where and the date when the last filing, refiling, or recording, if any, was made with respect thereto, and the filing number, if any, was made with respect thereto, and the filing number, if any, or book and page, if any, of recording and further state that the security agreement, statement, or notice, however denominated, in another filing office under this code or under any statute or other law repealed or modified by this code as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session is still effective. Section 9501 and Sections 9301, 9303, 9304, 9305, 9306, 9307, 9316, and 9337 determine the proper place to file such a financing statement. Except as specified in this subdivision, the provisions of Sections 9515 and 9522 for continuation statements apply to such a financing statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

14107.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, this code as it existed prior to January 1, 1976, shall apply to any questions of priority if the positions of the parties were fixed prior to January 1, 1976. In other cases questions of priority shall be determined by this code as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

14108.

Unless a change in law has clearly been made, the provisions of this code as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session shall be deemed declaratory of the meaning of this code as it existed prior to January 1, 1976. The amendments to subdivision (38) of Section 1201 and to subdivision (j) of Section 9104 of this code as amended by the Legislature at the 1973–74 Regular Session shall be deemed declaratory of the meaning of this code as it existed prior to January 1, 1976.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

14109.

(1) The amendments to this code relating to fixtures adopted by the Legislature at the 1979–1980 Regular Session shall apply to security interests which attach on or after January 1, 1981, in goods which become fixtures on or after January 1, 1981.

(2) If the record of a mortgage of real estate would have been effective as a fixture filing of goods described therein if the amendments to this code relating to fixtures adopted by the Legislature at the 1979–1980 Regular Session had been in effect on the date of recording the mortgage, the mortgage shall be deemed effective as a fixture filing as to such goods under subdivision (6) of Section 9402 as of January 1, 1981.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 15. EFFECTIVE DATE AND TRANSITION PROVISIONS [15101. - 15104.]

15101.

The repeal and addition of Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) made at the 1984 portion of the 1983–84 Regular Session shall become effective on January 1, 1985.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

15102.

The provisions of Division 13 (commencing with Section 13101) and Division 14 (commencing with Section 14101) shall continue to apply to this code, as revised by the Legislature at the 1983–84 Regular Session, and for this purpose, this code as it existed prior to January 1, 1985, and this code, as revised by the Legislature at the 1984 portion of the 1983–84 Regular Session, shall be considered one continuous statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

15103.

The owner of an interest (other than a security interest) in an uncertificated security (paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of Section 8102) whose interest was acquired prior to January 1, 1985, or was acquired after January 1, 1985, in an uncertificated security issued in respect of a security in which the owner had such an interest, shall not be required to take any action under Section 8313 or otherwise to preserve or protect that ownership interest, which shall remain effective and enforceable to the same extent it was prior to January 1, 1985, in the absence of that action. However, if a security interest first attaches to the security or any other interest in the security first becomes effective after that date, the provisions of Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) as revised shall govern the rights and obligations of all persons with respect to those interests. Except as otherwise provided in this division, the rights and obligations of all persons with respect to uncertificated
 securities issued prior to January 1, 1985, shall be governed by Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) as revised by Chapter 927 of the Statutes of 1984. All references in this section to Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) or a section thereof are references to Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) as revised by Chapter 927 of the Statutes of 1984.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15104.

A secured party who has a security interest in an uncertificated security (paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of Section 8102), which security interest attached to that uncertificated security (a) prior to January 1, 1985, or (b) after that date in an uncertificated security issued in respect of a security in which the secured party had the pre-January 1, 1985, security interest, shall not be required to take any action under Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) to protect, preserve, or perfect that security interest, which shall remain attached and perfected to the same extent it was prior to that date in the absence of any such action. The priority and perfection of those security interests shall continue to be governed by Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) as it existed prior to that date. However, on or before the last date on which any action is required under Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) (as it existed prior to that date) to continue the perfection of the security
 interest, in order to continue the perfection of the security interest the secured party, rather than complying with Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101), shall furnish to a party described in subparagraph (i), (iii), or (iv) of paragraph (h) of subdivision (1) of Section 8313, or if none of those is applicable, then to the issuer of the uncertificated security, either (x) a copy of either the financing statement previously filed to perfect the security interest or the security agreement that created the security interest, in either case bearing a copy or an original of the debtor’s signature, or (y) a written notification from the registered owner under paragraph (b) of subdivision (7) of Section 8403. Any such notice to an issuer shall be deemed a written notification under paragraph (b) of subdivision (7) of Section 8403, subject to the limitation that there can be no more than one registered pledge of an uncertificated security at any time (Section 8108). Except as otherwise provided in this
 division, the provisions of Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) as revised shall govern the rights and obligations of all persons with respect to a security interest in an uncertificated security that first attaches after January 1, 1985. All references in this section to Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) or a section thereof are references to Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) as revised by Chapter 927 of the Statutes of 1984.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 16. EFFECTIVE DATE AND TRANSITION PROVISIONS [16101. - 16104.]

16101.

The repeal and addition of Division 3 (commencing with Section 3101) and the repeal and addition, the amendment, and the addition of provisions of Division 4 (commencing with Section 4101), and the amendment of related sections, adopted by the Legislature in Chapter 914 of the Statutes of 1992, shall become effective on January 1, 1993. The Legislature intends that this action be construed as an amendment of Division 3 (commencing with Section 3101) and Division 4 (commencing with Section 4101), notwithstanding that the action took the form of a repeal and addition of Division 3 (commencing with Section 3101), and a repeal and addition to, and amendment of, or an addition to the provisions of Division 4 (commencing with Section 4101).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16102.

The provisions of Division 13 (commencing with Section 13101), Division 14 (commencing with Section 14101), and Division 15 (commencing with Section 15101) shall continue to apply to this code, as this code existed on January 1, 1993, and for this purpose, this code, as it existed prior to January 1, 1993, and this code, as it existed on January 1, 1993, shall be considered one continuous statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 668, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

16103.

Nothing in this division shall have the effect of (a) reviving a cause of action barred by limitation before January 1, 1993, or (b) applying Section 3118 or 4111 on limitation of actions to an action commenced before January 1, 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 668, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

16104.

Unless a change in law, as contrasted with a clarification, has clearly been made, this code, as it existed on January 1, 1993, shall be deemed declaratory of the meaning of this code as it existed prior to January 1, 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 668, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 17. EFFECTIVE DATE AND TRANSITION PROVISIONS [17101. - 17306.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [17101. - 17102.]

17101.

This division may be cited as Transitional Provisions for Uniform Commercial Code Amendments (2022).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 91.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17102.

(a) In this division, the following definitions apply.

(1) “Adjustment date” means July 1, 2025, or the date that is one year after the effective date of the act adding this division, whichever is later.

(2) “Division 12” means Division 12 (commencing with Section 12101).

(3) “Division 12 property” means a controllable account, controllable electronic record, or controllable payment intangible.

(b) The following definitions in other divisions apply to this division:

“Controllable account”Section 9102.“Controllable electronic record”Section 12102.“Controllable payment intangible”Section 9102.“Electronic money”Section 9102.“Financing statement”Section 9102.

(c) Division 1 (commencing with Section 1101) contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 91.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. General Transition Provisions [17201. - 17201.]

17201.

Except as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 17301), a transaction validly entered into before the effective date of the act adding this division and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from the transaction remain valid thereafter and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced as required or permitted by law other than this code or, if applicable, this code, as though the act adding this division had not taken effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 91.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Transitional Provisions for Divisions 9 and 12 [17301. - 17306.]

17301.

(a) Except as provided in this chapter, Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101), as amended by the act adding this division, and Division 12 apply to a transaction, lien, or other interest in property, even if the transaction, lien, or interest was entered into, created, or acquired before the effective date of the act adding this division.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), Sections 17302 to 17306, inclusive, the following rules apply:

(1) A transaction, lien, or interest in property that was validly entered into, created, or transferred before the effective date of the act adding this division and was not governed
 by this code, but would be subject to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101), as amended by the act adding this division, or Division 12 if it had been entered into, created, or transferred on or after the effective date of the act adding this division, including the rights, duties, and interests flowing from the transaction, lien, or interest, remains valid on and after the effective date of the act adding this division.

(2) The transaction, lien, or interest may be terminated, completed, consummated, and enforced as required or permitted by the act adding this division or by the law that would apply if the act adding this division had not taken effect.

(c) The act adding this division does not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before the effective date of the act adding
 this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 28.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17302.

(a) A security interest that is enforceable and perfected immediately before the effective date of the act adding this division is a perfected security interest under the act adding this division if, on the effective date of the act adding this division, the requirements for enforceability and perfection under the act adding this division are satisfied without further action.

(b) If a security interest is enforceable and perfected immediately before the effective date of the act adding this division, but the requirements for enforceability or perfection under the act adding this division are not satisfied on the effective date of the act adding this division, the
 following rules apply to the security interest:

(1) The security interest is a perfected security interest until the earlier of the time perfection would have ceased under the law in effect immediately before the effective date of the act adding this division or the adjustment date.

(2) The security interest remains enforceable thereafter only if the security interest satisfies the requirements for enforceability under Section 9203, as amended by the act adding this division, before the adjustment date.

(3) The security interest remains perfected thereafter only if the requirements for perfection under the act adding this division are satisfied before the time specified in paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 91.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17303.

A security interest that is enforceable immediately before the effective date of the act adding this division but is unperfected at that time:

(a) remains an enforceable security interest until the adjustment date;

(b) remains enforceable thereafter if the security interest becomes enforceable under Section 9203, as amended by the act adding this division, on the effective date of the act adding this division or before the adjustment date; and

(c) becomes perfected:

(1) without further
 action, on the effective date of the act adding this division if the requirements for perfection under the act adding this division are satisfied before or at that time; or

(2) when the requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 91.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17304.

(a) If action, other than the filing of a financing statement, is taken before the effective date of the act adding this division and the action would have resulted in perfection of the security interest had the security interest become enforceable before the effective date of the act adding this division, the action is effective to perfect a security interest that attaches under the act adding this division before the adjustment date. An attached security interest becomes unperfected on the adjustment date unless the security interest becomes a perfected security interest under the act adding this division before the adjustment date.

(b) The filing of a financing statement
 before the effective date of the act adding this division is effective to perfect a security interest on the effective date of the act adding this division to the extent the filing would satisfy the requirements for perfection under the act adding this division.

(c) The taking of an action before the effective date of the act adding this division is sufficient for the enforceability of a security interest on the effective date of the act adding this division if the action would satisfy the requirements for enforceability under the act adding this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 91.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17305.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), the act adding this division determines the priority of conflicting claims to collateral.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), if the priorities of claims to collateral were established before the effective date of the act adding this division, Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) as in effect before the effective date of the act adding this division determines priority.

(c) On the adjustment date, to the extent the priorities determined by Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101), as amended by the act adding this division, modify the priorities established before
 the effective date of the act adding this division, the priorities of
 claims to Division 12 property and electronic money established before the effective date of the act adding this division cease to apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 91.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17306.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), Division 12 determines the priority of conflicting claims to Division 12 property when the priority rules of Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) as amended by the act adding this division do not apply.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), when the priority rules of Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) as amended by the act adding this division do not apply and the priorities of claims to Division 12 property were established before the effective date of the act adding this division, law other than Division 12 determines priority.

(c) When the priority rules of
 Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) as amended by the act adding this division do not apply, to the extent the priorities determined by the act adding this division modify the priorities established before the effective date of the act adding this division, the priorities of claims to Division 12 property established before the effective date of the act adding this division cease to apply on the adjustment date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 91.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

